Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10C-703] Transportation
network company and transportation network company driver; disclosure;
limitations; insurance requirements. (a) Upon entering into an
agreement with a transportation network company driver, a transportation
network company shall immediately disclose the following in writing to the transportation
network company driver:

(1) The insurance coverage and limits of liability
that the transportation network company provides when the transportation
network company driver uses a personal vehicle while engaged in a prearranged
ride; and

(2) That the transportation network company driver's
personal motor vehicle insurance policy might not provide any required or
optional coverage when the transportation network company driver uses a personal
vehicle while engaged in a prearranged ride.

(b) On or before September 1, 2016, and
thereafter, a transportation network company driver or transportation network
company on the transportation network company driver's behalf shall maintain a
primary motor vehicle insurance policy that recognizes that the transportation
network company driver is a transportation network company driver or otherwise
uses a personal vehicle to transport passengers for compensation and covers the
transportation network company driver:

(1) While the transportation network company driver
is logged onto the transportation network company's digital network or software
application service; and

(2) While the transportation network company driver
is engaged in a prearranged ride.

(c) The following motor vehicle insurance
requirements shall apply while a participating transportation network company
driver is logged onto the transportation network company's digital network or
software application service and is available to receive transportation
requests but is not engaged in a prearranged ride:

(1) Primary motor vehicle liability insurance in the
amount of at least $50,000 for death and bodily injury per person, $100,000 for
death and bodily injury per accident, and $25,000 for property damage per
accident, costs of defense outside of all such limits;

(2) Personal injury protection coverage that meets the
minimum coverage amount where required by section 431:10C-103.5; and

(3) The coverage requirements of this subsection may
be satisfied by any of the following:

(A) A motor vehicle insurance policy
maintained by the transportation network company driver;

(B) A motor vehicle insurance policy
maintained by the transportation network company; or

(C) Any combination of subparagraphs (A) and
(B).

(d) The following motor vehicle insurance
requirements shall apply while a transportation network company driver is
engaged in a prearranged ride:

(1) Primary motor vehicle liability insurance that
provides at least $1,000,000 for death, bodily injury, and property damage per
accident, costs of defense outside such limits;

(2) Personal injury protection coverage that meets the
minimum coverage amount where required by section 431:10C-103.5; and

(3) The coverage requirements of this subsection may
be satisfied by any of the following:

(A) A motor vehicle insurance policy maintained
by the transportation network company driver;

(B) A motor vehicle insurance policy maintained
by the transportation network company; or

(C) Any combination of subparagraphs (A) and
(B).

(e) If insurance maintained pursuant to
subsection (c) or (d) has lapsed or does not provide the required coverage, the
transportation network company insurer shall provide the coverage required by this
section beginning with the first dollar of a claim and shall have the duty to
defend the claim.

(f) Insurers providing the motor vehicle
insurance policies pursuant to this section shall offer the following optional
coverages, which any named insured may elect to reject or purchase:

(1) Uninsured and underinsured motorist coverages for
the transportation network company driver and passengers, as provided in
section 431:10C-301, which shall be equal to the primary liability limits
specified in subsections (c) and (d); provided that uninsured and underinsured
motorist coverage offers shall also provide for written rejection of the
coverages as provided in section 431:10C-301;

(2) Uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage
stacking options as provided in section 431:10C-301; provided that the offer of
the stacking options shall also provide for written rejection as provided in
section 431:10C-301; and

(3) An offer of required optional additional
insurance coverages as provided in section 431:10C-302.

(g) In the event the only named insured under
the motor vehicle insurance policy issued pursuant to this section is the
transportation network company, the insurer or the transportation network
company shall:

(1) Disclose the coverages in writing to the
transportation network company driver;

(2) Disclose to the transportation network company
driver in writing that all optional coverages available may not have been
purchased under sections 431:10C-301 and 431:10C-302; and

(3) Obtain a written acknowledgment from the
transportation network company driver of receipt of the written disclosures
required in paragraphs (1) and (2).

The standard disclosure forms used in paragraphs (1)
and (2), and every modification of such forms intended to be used, must be
filed with the commissioner within fifteen days of providing such disclosure to
the transportation network company driver. The insurer shall also send to the
transportation network company driver every modified disclosure form within
fifteen days of the filing of such modified disclosure form and comply with paragraph
(3). Such disclosures and acknowledgment may be sent and received by
electronic means.

(h) Coverage under an insurance policy
maintained by the transportation network company shall not be dependent on a
personal motor vehicle insurer first denying a claim nor shall a personal motor
vehicle insurance policy be required to first deny a claim.

(i) Insurance required by this section may be
placed with an insurer licensed under section 431:3-203 or with a surplus lines
insurer eligible under section 431:8-301 that has a credit rating of no less
than A minus from A.M. Best or A from Demotech or similar rating from another
rating agency recognized by the insurance division.

(j) Insurance satisfying the requirements of
this section shall be deemed to satisfy the financial responsibility
requirement for a motor vehicle under chapter 287, the motor vehicle safety
responsibility act.

(k) A transportation network company driver
shall carry proof of coverage that meets the requirements of subsections (c)
and (d) at all times during the transportation network company driver's use of a
personal vehicle in connection with a transportation network company's digital
network or software application service. In the event of an accident, a
transportation network company driver shall provide this insurance coverage
information to the directly interested parties, motor vehicle insurers, and
investigating police officers, upon request. Upon such request, a
transportation network company driver shall also disclose to directly
interested parties, motor vehicle insurers, and investigating police officers
whether the transportation network company driver was logged on to the
transportation network company's digital network or software application
service or engaged in a prearranged ride at the time of the accident.

(l) Unless specified in the personal motor
vehicle insurance policy or endorsement, nothing in this section shall be
construed to require a personal motor vehicle insurance policy maintained by a
transportation network company driver to provide primary or excess coverage while
engaged in a prearranged ride. While the transportation network company driver
is engaged in a prearranged ride, and notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, the following shall apply:

(1) The transportation network company driver's or
the vehicle owner's personal motor vehicle insurance policy shall not be
required to provide any coverage to any person or entity unless the policy
expressly provides for that coverage while the driver is engaged in a
prearranged ride, with or without a separate charge, or the policy contains an
amendment or endorsement to provide coverage while the driver is engaged in a
prearranged ride, for which a separately stated premium may be charged; and

(2) The transportation network company driver's or
the vehicle owner's personal motor vehicle insurance policy shall not be
required to provide a duty to defend or indemnify the driver's activities in
connection with the transportation network company, unless the policy expressly
provides otherwise while the driver is engaged in a prearranged ride, with or
without a separate charge, or the policy contains an amendment or endorsement
to provide coverage while the driver is engaged in a prearranged ride, for
which a separately stated premium may be charged.

(m) This section shall not restrict any motor
vehicle insurance policy coverage applicable to a passenger or pedestrian,
other than the limitations in the transportation network company driver's or
the vehicle owner's personal motor vehicle insurance policy described in
subsection (l).

(n) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, a personal motor vehicle insurer may, at its discretion, offer a motor
vehicle liability insurance policy, or an amendment or endorsement to an
existing policy that covers a private passenger vehicle, station wagon type
vehicle, sport utility vehicle, or similar type of vehicle with a passenger
capacity of eight persons or less, including the driver, while the driver is logged
onto the transportation network company's digital network or software
application service, or while engaged in a prearranged ride, if the policy
expressly provides for coverage while the driver is logged onto the
transportation network company's digital network or software application
service or engaged in prearranged rides, with or without a separate charge, or
the policy contains an amendment or an endorsement to provide coverage while
the driver is logged onto the transportation network company's digital network
or software application service or engaged in a prearranged ride, for which a
separately stated premium may be charged.

(o) Notwithstanding any other law affecting
whether one or more policies of insurance that may apply with respect to an
occurrence is primary or excess, this section shall determine the obligations
under insurance policies issued to transportation network companies and, if
applicable, transportation network company drivers. [L 2016, c 236, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next